Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 250.
Legislative declaration.

It is hereby declared that the inability of individual producers to develop new and larger markets for agricultural commodities results in an unreasonable and unnecessary economic waste of the agricultural wealth of this State. These conditions and the accompanying waste jeopardize the future continued production of adequate food supplies for the people of this and other states. These conditions vitally concern the health, safety, and general welfare of the people in this State. It is therefore declared the legislative purpose and the policy of this State:

to enable agricultural producers of this State, with the aid of the State, to more effectively correlate the marketing of their agricultural commodities with market demands;

to establish orderly, efficient, and equitable marketing of agricultural commodities;

to provide methods and means for the development of new and larger markets for agricultural commodities produced in Vermont;

to eliminate or reduce the economic waste in the marketing of agricultural commodities; and

to eliminate unjust impairment of the purchasing power of the agricultural producers of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1993, No. 73

, § 1, eff. June 10, 1993.

§ 251.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Agricultural commodity” means any agricultural commodity, including: apples, horticultural crops, fruits and vegetables, poultry, maple syrup, Christmas trees, livestock, and honey, either in their natural state or as processed by the producer. The term does not include milk, timber, or timber products, other than Christmas trees.

“Producer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, or other business entity engaged within this State in the business of producing an agricultural commodity or causing an agricultural commodity to be produced for any market. The term shall only apply to persons who are not exempt under a marketing rule which gives special consideration to exemptions for small producers.

“Handler” means any person engaged in the operation of packing, grading, selling, offering for sale, or marketing any marketable agricultural commodities, who as owner, agent, or otherwise ships or causes an agricultural commodity to be shipped.

“Processor” means any person engaged within this State in processing, or in the operation of receiving, grading, packing, canning, freezing, dehydrating, fermenting, distilling, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, or in any other way preserving or changing the form of agricultural commodities for the purpose of marketing this commodity, but shall not include a person engaged in manufacturing a different product from an agricultural commodity.

“Distributor” means any person engaged within this State in selling, offering for sale, marketing, or distributing agricultural commodities which he or she has purchased or acquired from a producer or other person or which he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer or other person, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise, but shall not include a retailer, except a retailer who purchases or acquires from, or handles on behalf of, any producer or other person an agricultural commodity subject to regulation by the marketing agreement or order covering the commodity.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or his or her designee.

“Marketing rule” means a rule issued by the Board or commission pursuant to this chapter prescribing rules governing the marketing for processing, the distribution, the sale of, or the handling in any manner of any agricultural commodity sold in this State during any specified period.

“Wholesale” means the act of selling to retail vendors, commission merchants, producers, wholesalers, handlers, processors, distributors, institutional users, or commercial users mainly for resale or business use.

“Board” means the Vermont Apple Marketing Board established by section 252 of this title.

“Bushel” means 40 pounds.

“Commodity marketing board” or “marketing board” means any agricultural commodity marketing board established under section 253a of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1985, No. 41

, § 1, eff. May 11, 1985;

1993, No. 73

, § 1, eff. June 10, 1993;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.